Utah statutes.
70-3a-404.   Remedies.

(1) (a)  An owner of a mark registered under this chapter may proceed by suit to enjoin the manufacture, use, display, or sale of any counterfeits or imitations of the mark.

(b)  A court of competent jurisdiction may grant injunctions to restrain the manufacture, use, display, or sale as may be considered by the court just and reasonable.

(2)  A court may:

(a)  require the defendants to pay the owner:

(i)  all profits derived from the wrongful manufacture, use, display, or sale of a registered mark; or

(ii)  all damages suffered because of the wrongful manufacture, use, display, or sale of a registered mark;

(b)  order that any counterfeits or imitations of a registered mark in the possession or under the control of any defendant in an action be delivered to the following to be destroyed:

(i)  an officer of the court; or

(ii)  the complainant; or

(c)  take a combination of the actions described in Subsections (2)(a) and (b).

(3)  A court may enter judgment for the prevailing party:

(a)  in an action where the court finds:

(i)  the other party committed the wrongful act:

(A)  with knowledge;

(B)  in bad faith; or

(ii)  as according to the circumstances of the case; and

(b)  in an amount not to exceed:

(i)  three times the profits and damages of the prevailing party; and

(ii)  the reasonable attorneys fees of the prevailing party.

(4)  The enumeration of any right or remedy in this section does not affect a registrant's right to prosecute under any penal law of this state.

